src/morphology/stems/pronouns.lexc
!! Pronouns
!  --------
!! Pronouns in the Karelian language are references to things.

LEXICON Pronouns


minä+Pron+Use/Dialect+Pers+Sg1:mi PRON_MI/NÄ ;
mie+Pron+Pers+Sg1:mi PRON_MI/E ;
sie+Pron+Pers+Sg2:si PRON_MI/E ;
hiän+Pron+Pers+Sg3:h  PRON_H/IÄN ;
myö+Pron+Pers+Pl1:m  PRON_M/YÖ ;
työ+Pron+Pers+Pl2:t  PRON_M/YÖ ;
hyö+Pron+Pers+Pl3:h  PRON_M/YÖ ;

tämä+Pron+Dem:tä  PRON_TÄ/MÄ ;
nämä+Pron+Dem:nä  PRON_NÄ/MÄ ;
tuo+Pron+Dem:t  PRON_T/UO ;
nuo+Pron+Dem:n  PRON_N/UO ;
še+Pron+Dem:š  PRON_Š/E ;
ne+Pron+Dem:n  PRON_N/E ;

iče+Pron+Reflex:ič   PRON_IČ/E ;
kaikki+Pron+Ind:kai  PRON_KAI/KKI ;
kumpaine+Pron+Interr:kumpa  PRON_KUMPA/INE ;
kumpaine+Pron+Rel:kumpa  PRON_KUMPA/INE ;
kumpaine+Pron+Ind:kumpa  PRON_KUMPA/INE ;
jokahini+Pron+Ind:jokahi  PRON_JOKAHI/NI ;
moni+Pron+Ind:mon  PRON_MON/I ;
muu+Pron+Ind:mu  PRON_MU/U ;

kennih+Pron+Ind:ke PRON_JOKA ;
joka+Pron+Ind:joka   PRON_JOKA ;
koko+Pron+Ind:koko  PRON_JOKA ;

kudai+Pron+Interr:ku PRON_KU/DAI ;
ken+Pron+Interr:ke PRON_KE/N ;
mi+Pron+Interr:mi PRON_MI ;
ku+Pron+Interr:ku PRON_KU ;
molompi+Pron:molom PRON_MOLOM/PI ;

toini+Pron:toi PRON_TOI/NI ;

mitänä+Pron+Ind+Sg+Nom:mitänä #  ;

mie # ;
sie # ;
hiä # ;
myö # ;
työ # ;
hyö # ;

LEXICON PRON_MI/NÄ

0:nä  PRON_SGNOM_0 ;
0:nu  PRON_CASES_SG_FRONT ;

LEXICON PRON_MI/E

0:e PRON_SGNOM_0 ;
0:u PRON_CASES_SG_BACK ;
%<sg%>%<par%>:lma  # ;

LEXICON PRON_H/IÄN

0:iän  PRON_SGNOM_0 ;
0:än PRON_SGPAR_TÄ ;
0:äne PRON_CASES_SG_FRONT ;


LEXICON PRON_M/YÖ

0:yö PRON_PLNOM_0 ;
0:e PRON_CASES_PL_FRONT ;

LEXICON PRON_TÄ/MÄ

0:mä PRON_SGNOM_0 ;
0  PRON_CASES_SG_FRONT ;
0  PRON_SGPAR_TÄ ;
0:mä PRON_SGGEN_N ;
%<sg%>%<ill%>:hä  # ;

LEXICON PRON_NÄ/MÄ

0:mä PRON_PLNOM_0 ;
0  PRON_CASES_PL_FRONT ;
0  PRON_PLGEN_IJEN ;

LEXICON PRON_T/UO

0:uo  PRON_SGNOM_0 ;
0:uo  PRON_CASES_SG_BACK ;

LEXICON PRON_N/UO

0:uo  PRON_PLNOM_0 ;
0:oi  PRON_CASES_PL_BACK ;

LEXICON PRON_Š/E

0:e  PRON_SGNOM_0 ;
0:i  PRON_CASES_SG_FRONT ;
%<sg%>%<gen%>:en # ;
%<sg%>%<ine%>:iinä # ;
%<sg%>%<ela%>:iitä # ;
%<sg%>%<ill%>:iih # ;
%<sg%>%<ill%>:inne # ;
%<sg%>%<par%>:itä # ;

LEXICON PRON_N/E

0:e  PRON_PLNOM_0 ;
0:i  PRON_CASES_PL_FRONT ;
%<pl%>%<gen%>:iijen # ;
%<pl%>%<ill%>:iihi # ;

LEXICON PRON_IČ/E

0:e  PRON_SGNOM_0 ;
0:e  PRON_CASES_SG_FRONT ;
0:či PRON_SGPAR_E ;

LEXICON PRON_KAI/KKI

0 PRON_SGNOM_0 ;
0:kki PRON_SGNOM_0 ;
0:ke  PRON_CASES_SG_WEAK_BACK ;
0:k  PRON_CASES_PL_WEAK_BACK ;
%<pl%>%<ins%>:kin # ;
%<pl%>%<com%>:kkine # ;

LEXICON PRON_KU/DAI

0:dai PRON_SGNOM_0 ;
0:dua PRON_CASES_SG_BACK ;

LEXICON PRON_MOLOM/PI

0:pi  PRON_SGNOM_0 ;
0:m   PRON_CASES_PL_WEAK_BACK ;
0:p   PRON_CASES_PL_BACK_STRONG ;
0:ma  PRON_CASES_SG_BACK ;

LEXICON PRON_JOKAHI/NI

0:ni PRON_SGNOM_0 ;
0:se PRON_CASES_SG_BACK ;
0:s  PRON_SGPAR_TA ;

LEXICON PRON_KUMPA/INE

0:ine PRON_SGNOM_0 ;
0:ise PRON_CASES_SG_BACK ;
0:is  PRON_SGPAR_TA ;

0:ni PRON_SGNOM_0 ;
0:ne PRON_SGNOM_0 ;
0:se PRON_CASES_SG_BACK ;
0:s  PRON_SGPAR_TA ;
0:s  PRON_CASES_PL_BACK ;
0:s  PRON_PLGEN_IEN ;

LEXICON PRON_KE/N

0:n PRON_SGNOM_0 ;
0:ne PRON_CASES_SG_FRONT ;
0 PRON_CASES_SG_FRONT ;

LEXICON PRON_MI

0  PRON_SGNOM_0 ;
0  PRON_SGPAR_TÄ ;
0 PRON_CASES_SG_FRONT_S ;

LEXICON PRON_KU

0 PRON_SGNOM_0 ;
0  PRON_CASES_SG_BACK ;

LEXICON PRON_JOKA

0  PRON_SGNOM_0 ;

LEXICON PRON_MON/I

0:i PRON_SGNOM_0 ;
0:e PRON_CASES_SG_BACK ;
0  PRON_SGPAR_TA ;
0  PRON_CASES_PL_BACK ;


LEXICON PRON_MU/U

0:u PRON_SGNOM_0 ;
0:u PRON_CASES_SG_BACK_S ;
0:u  PRON_SGPAR_TA ;
0  PRON_CASES_PL_BACK ;

LEXICON PRON_TOI/NI

0:ni PRON_SGNOM_0 ;
0:se PRON_CASES_SG_BACK ;
0:s PRON_SGPAR_TA ;
0:s PRON_PLPAR_IE ;



! vim: set ft=xfst-lexc:
